Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.145

Members may belong to association with same objectives—Contracts with associations authorized.

Any member of an agricultural commission may also be a member or officer of an association which has the same objectives for which the agricultural commission was formed. An agricultural commission may also contract with such association for services necessary to carry out any purposes authorized under this chapter, provided that an appropriate contract has been entered into.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 4.]